Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 1

Uniform Law

30-3-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Absence as Evidence of Death and Absentees' Property Law.”

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.9 (Williams, § 8407.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1801.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 537, 919.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 300.5.

Law Reviews.

Dead or Alive? The Tom Buntin Cases (Donald F. Paine) 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 37 (1992).

30-3-102. Presumption of death from mere absence — Exposure to specific peril considered — Distribution of funds of absentee.

A person absent from such person's place of residence and unheard of for seven (7) years or longer, whose absence is not satisfactorily explained, is presumed to be dead; provided, however, such presumption may be rebutted by proof.

Exposure to specific peril shall be considered in every case. If during such absence the person has been exposed to a specific peril of death, this fact shall be considered by the court, or if there be a jury, shall be sufficient evidence for submission to the jury.

If the clerks of the respective courts of record and/or the personal representatives have any funds belonging to such absentee who, upon the order of the court, is determined to be dead, such funds shall be distributed according to law as of the date of death of the absentee as determined by the court. The validity and effect of the distribution of the property shall be determined by the court having probate jurisdiction administering the estate.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 1; 1949, ch. 265, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1802; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 23; 2001, ch. 121, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 121, § 6 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to any person whose death has not previously been adjudicated under title 30, chapter 3, part 1, regardless of the date of disappearance or absence.

Cross-References. Presumption as to persons missing in action, § 24-5-110.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 191.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 537, 830, 920.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 300.5.

30-3-103. Provisions of insurance policies relative to proof of absence or death declared invalid — Statutory period of limitations.

No provisions concerning the effect to be given to evidence of absence or of death, in any policy of life or accident insurance or in the charter or bylaws of any mutual or fraternal insurance association executed or adopted after February 15, 1941, shall be valid.

When any such policy, charter or bylaws executed or adopted after February 15, 1941, contains a provision requiring a beneficiary to bring suit upon a claim of death within one (1) year or other period after the death of the insured, and the fact of the absence of the insured is relied upon by the beneficiary as evidence of the death, the action may be begun, notwithstanding such provision in the policy or charter or bylaws, at any time within the statutory period of limitation for actions on contracts in writing dating from the date of the giving of written notice of such absence to the insurer, which notice shall be given within one (1) year from the date when the beneficiary last heard of the absent insured. If such notice is not given, then the statutory period runs from the time when the absent person was last heard of by the beneficiary.

Provided, that if the seven (7) year absence is relied upon to establish death, then the statutory period of limitations shall only commence to run at the end of the seven (7) years.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1803.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 927.

30-3-104. Receiver — Appointment — Powers.

When a person domiciled in this state and having an interest in any form of property disappears and is absent from the person's place of residence without being heard of after diligent inquiry, upon application for a finding of such disappearance and absence and of the necessity for the appointment of a receiver to the chancery court of the county of the absentee's domicile by any person who would have an interest in the property were the absentee deceased or by an insurer or surety or creditor of such absentee, after notice as provided in § 30-3-106 and upon good cause being shown, the court may find that the person was last heard of as of a date certain and may appoint a receiver to take charge of the person's estate. The absentee shall be made a party to the proceeding, and any other person who would have an interest in the property were the absentee deceased, upon direction by the court, may be made party to the proceeding.

The receiver, upon giving bond to be fixed in amount and with surety to be approved by the court, and upon such conditions as will ensure the conservation of such property, shall, under the direction of the court, administer the property as an equity receivership with power:

To take possession of all property of the absentee wherever situated;

To collect all debts due the absentee;

To bring and defend suits;

To pay insurance premiums;

With the approval of the court in each case, to pay all debts due by the absentee; and

To pay over the proceeds of such part or all of the property, or the income thereof, as may be necessary for the maintenance and support of the absentee's dependents, and if the personal property of the absentee be not sufficient to pay all of the absentee's debt and to provide for the maintenance and support of the absentee's dependents, the receiver may apply to the court for an order to sell or mortgage so much of the real estate as may be necessary therefor, the sale or mortgage to be reported to, approved and confirmed by the court and the receiver to be ordered to make a deed conveying or mortgaging the real property to the purchaser or lender upon the purchaser or lender complying with the terms of sale or mortgage.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1804.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 921, 923.

30-3-105. Temporary receiver.

Upon the filing of the application referred to in § 30-3-104, the court may for cause shown appoint a temporary receiver to take charge of the property of the absentee and conserve it pending hearing upon the application. Such temporary receiver shall qualify by giving bond in an amount and with surety to be approved by the court and shall exercise only the powers named by the court.

Should a permanent receiver be appointed, the temporary receiver shall turn over all property in the temporary receiver's possession, less such as may be necessary to cover the temporary receiver's expenses and compensation as allowed by the court, to the permanent receiver, and shall file the temporary receiver's final account and upon its approval be discharged.

Should the application for permanent receiver be denied, the temporary receiver shall restore to those from whom it may have been obtained all property in the temporary receiver's possession, less only as may be necessary to cover the temporary receiver's expenses and compensation as allowed by the court, and shall file a final account and be discharged. Where the application is denied the expenses of the temporary receivership and the compensation of the temporary receiver may, in the discretion of the court, be taxed as costs of the proceeding to be paid by the applicant and shall be enforceable by the temporary receiver against the applicant.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1805.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 922.

30-3-106. Notices.

All notices required under this part shall be served upon all parties, ordered by the court to be served, in the manner prescribed by existing statutes or rules, except that in addition thereto the absentee shall be served by publication once a week for four (4) successive weeks in a newspaper printed in the English language of general circulation in the county of the absentee's domicile, the last publication to be not less than ten (10) nor more than twenty (20) days prior to the time set for any hearing. The original notice prescribed in § 30-3-104, shall require each person claiming an interest in the property of the absentee to file in court within a time fixed by the court a statement of the nature and extent of such interest.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1806.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 921.

30-3-107. Search for absentee directed by court.

The court, upon application, may direct the receiver to make search for the absentee in any manner which the court may deem advisable, including any or all of the following methods:

By inserting in one or more suitable periodicals a notice requesting information from any person having knowledge of the absentee's whereabouts;

By notifying officers of justice and public welfare agencies in appropriate locations of the absentee's disappearance; or

By engaging the services of an investigation agency.

The expenses of such search and of the notices provided for in § 30-3-106 shall be taxed as costs and paid out of the property of the absentee.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1807.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 924.

30-3-108. Final hearing and finding.

At any time during the proceedings, upon application to the court and presentation of satisfactory evidence of the absentee's death, the court may make a final finding and decree that the absentee is dead, in which event the decree and a transcript of all of the receivership proceedings shall be certified to the probate court for any administration required by law upon the estate of a decedent, and the receivership court shall proceed no further except for the purposes hereinafter set forth in § 30-3-110(1) and (3).

After the lapse of seven (7) years from the date of the finding provided for in § 30-3-104, if the absentee has not appeared and if the court has received evidence sufficient to rebut the presumption that a person absent seven (7) years is dead, then the court may proceed to take further evidence and thereafter make a final finding and enter a decree declaring that all interest of the absentee in the absentee's property has ceased and devolved upon others by reason of the absentee's failure to appear and make claim.

After the lapse of seven (7) years from the date of the finding provided for in § 30-3-104, if the absentee has not appeared and if sufficient proof has not been received to rebut the presumption that a person absent seven (7) years is dead, then the court may make a final finding and decree that the absentee is dead, in which event the decree and a transcript of all of the receivership proceedings shall be certified to the probate court for any administration required by law upon the estate of a decedent, and the receivership court shall proceed no further except for the purposes hereinafter set forth in § 30-3-110.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1808; Acts 2001, ch. 121, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 121, § 6 provided that the amendments by that act shall apply to any person whose death has not previously been adjudicated under Title 30, Chapter 3, Part 1, regardless of the date of disappearance or absence.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 925, 926.

30-3-109. Claim of absentee barred by judgment.

No action shall be brought by an absentee to recover any portion of the absentee's property after the final finding and judgment provided for in § 30-3-108.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1809.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 929.

Collateral References.

Refund of state inheritance or estate tax where claims are proven against estate after tax was paid. 63 A.L.R.3d 924.

30-3-110. Termination of receivership.

Upon the entry of any final finding and decree as provided in § 30-3-108, the court shall proceed to wind up the receivership and terminate the proceedings:

In the case of a finding under subsections (a) or (c) of § 30-3-108, that the absentee is dead:

By satisfying all outstanding debts and charges of the receivership; and

By then certifying the proceedings to the probate court; or

In the case of a finding under § 30-3-108(b):

By satisfying all outstanding debts and charges;

By then deducting for the insurance fund provided in § 30-3-113, a sum equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total value of the property remaining, including amounts paid to the receivership estate from policies of insurance on the absentee's life; and

By distributing the remaining property as provided in § 30-3-111; and

In both cases by requiring the receiver's account and upon its approval discharging the receiver and the receiver's bondsmen and entering a final decree terminating the receivership.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1810; Acts 2001, ch. 121, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 121, § 6 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to any person whose death has not previously been adjudicated under title 30, chapter 3, part 1, regardless of the date of disappearance or absence.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 925, 926.

30-3-111. Distribution of property.

The property remaining for distribution in accordance with § 30-3-110(2)(C), shall be distributed among those persons who would be entitled thereto under the laws of descent and distribution of this state had the absentee died intestate as of the date determined by the court in its final finding and decree, or in case the absentee leaves a document which, had the absentee died, would under the laws of this state be entitled to probate as the absentee's will, the distribution shall be according to the terms of that document as of that date. The validity and effect of the distribution of the property shall be determined by the court administering the receivership and shall be final and binding upon all persons including the absentee.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1811.

Cross-References. Distribution of estates, title 30, ch. 2, part 7.

Intestate succession title 31, chapter 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 926, 929.

30-3-112. Insurance proceeds.

At the time of the distribution under § 30-3-111, the court may direct the payment to the beneficiaries of any sums due and unpaid under any policies of insurance upon the life of the absentee, if the claim is uncontested by the insurer.

If the claim is contested the court shall take jurisdiction of the action and shall submit to a jury, if one be called for, the issue of death of the insured and any other issues arising under the policy.

Where the survival of a named beneficiary is not established this part shall apply as if the proceeds of the insurance were a part of the estate of the absentee.

If in any proceeding under subsections (a) and (b) the absentee is not found to be deceased and the policy provides for a surrender value, the beneficiary may request the receiver, acting for the insured, to demand the payment of surrender value. The receiver's receipt for such payment shall be a release to the insurer of all claims under the policy. The receiver shall pay over to the beneficiary (if surviving the insured, otherwise to the estate of the absentee) the sum thus received, reserving only an amount allowed by the court as costs of the proceedings under this section.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1812.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 927.

30-3-113. Fund for reimbursement of appearing absentees.

In each case of termination of receivership as provided in § 30-3-110, the court, except in cases where the proceedings have been certified to the probate court under § 30-3-108(a) or (c), shall set aside the sum there named and direct its payment by the receiver to the state treasurer, who shall deal with such sum in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 29.

Any person lawfully entitled to receive any money paid to the state treasurer pursuant to this section may claim the amount due in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.

All sums held by the state treasurer under this part prior to May 9, 2005, shall be transferred to the appropriate account within the state treasury that is maintained for the prompt payment of claims under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, and all such sums and claims shall be handled in accordance with the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-1813; Acts 2001, ch. 121, § 5; 2005, ch. 141, § 1; 2017, ch. 457, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 121, § 6 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to any person whose death has not previously been adjudicated under title 30, chapter 3, part 1, regardless of the date of disappearance or absence.

Acts 2005, ch. 141, § 4 provided that the amendment by that Act applied to all future and existing sums held by the state treasurer pursuant to title 30, chapter 3, part 1, regardless of the date the sums were received.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act” in (a) and (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 928, 929.

30-3-114. Construction and application of part.

This part shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate the general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact the same law.

This part shall have no retroactive application to the time prior to February 15, 1941.

Acts 1941, ch. 102, §§ 12, 16; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 8407.21, 8407.22 (Williams, § 8407.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-1814, 30-1815.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 919.